New York, session 2025-2026, A3873.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 233 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. For the purposes of this section, "gun buyback" shall mean remuner- 4 ation for the voluntary relinquishment of a firearm, rifle or shotgun 5 for disposal that renders such weapon inoperable, and all components 6 thereof unable to be incorporated in an operable firearm, rifle or shot- 7 gun. No firearm, rifle or shotgun shall be eligible for surrender and 8 remuneration if it was manufactured for the purpose of receiving a mone- 9 tary reward under a gun buyback program. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07477-01-5